Florida, session 2026, HB1383.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (7) of section
499.0295, Florida Statutes, as amended by HB 1381, 2026 Regular
Session, is amended to read:
499.0295 Experimental treatments for terminal conditions
and life-threatening rare diseases.—
(7)
(c) The department shall annually publish a public report
of experimental treatment outcomes and safety signals in the
aggregate. The health information and proprietary pricing
information contained in the report is confidential and exempt
from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Constitution.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that the health information and proprietary pricing
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1383-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1383 2026
information contained in the annual public report of
experimental treatment outcomes and safety signals under s.
499.0295, Florida Statutes, be made confidential and exempt from
s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the
State Constitution. The Legislature finds that the release of
such information could harm patients with terminal conditions or
life-threatening rare diseases by exposing extremely sensitive
personal health data. The Legislature further finds that
patients who pursue experimental treatments under the Promising
Pathways Act have a strong expectation of privacy regarding
their medical information, and that the potential harm resulting
from disclosure of such information outweighs any public benefit
that may be derived from its release.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 1381 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1383-00